Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.aff
SFX j Y 86
SFX j as      as              as        
SFX j as      a               as        
SFX j as      an              as        
SFX j as      ae              as        
SFX j as      arum            as        
SFX j as      is              as        
SFX j 0       que             as        
SFX j 0       ne              as        
SFX j 0       ve              as        
SFX j as      aque            as        
SFX j as      ane             as        
SFX j as      ave             as        
SFX j as      anque           as        
SFX j as      anne            as        
SFX j as      anve            as        
SFX j as      aeque           as        
SFX j as      aene            as        
SFX j as      aeve            as        
SFX j as      asque           as        
SFX j as      asne            as        
SFX j as      asve            as        
SFX j as      arumque         as        
SFX j as      arumne          as        
SFX j as      arumve          as        
SFX j as      isque           as        
SFX j as      isne            as        
SFX j as      isve            as        
SFX j es      es              es        
SFX j es      e               es        
SFX j es      en              es        
SFX j es      ae              es        
SFX j es      as              es        
SFX j es      arum            es        
SFX j es      is              es        
SFX j 0       que             es        
SFX j 0       ne              es        
SFX j 0       ve              es        
SFX j es      esque           es        
SFX j es      esne            es        
SFX j es      esve            es        
SFX j es      eque            es        
SFX j es      ene             es        
SFX j es      eve             es        
SFX j es      enque           es        
SFX j es      enne            es        
SFX j es      enve            es        
SFX j es      aeque           es        
SFX j es      aene            es        
SFX j es      aeve            es        
SFX j es      asque           es        
SFX j es      asne            es        
SFX j es      asve            es        
SFX j es      arumque         es        
SFX j es      arumne          es        
SFX j es      arumve          es        
SFX j es      isque           es        
SFX j es      isne            es        
SFX j es      isve            es        
SFX j e       e               e         
SFX j e       en              e         
SFX j e       es              e         
SFX j e       ae              e         
SFX j e       as              e         
SFX j e       arum            e         
SFX j e       is              e         
SFX j 0       que             e         
SFX j 0       ne              e         
SFX j 0       ve              e         
SFX j e       enque           e         
SFX j e       enne            e         
SFX j e       enve            e         
SFX j e       esque           e         
SFX j e       esne            e         
SFX j e       esve            e         
SFX j e       aeque           e         
SFX j e       aene            e         
SFX j e       aeve            e         
SFX j e       asque           e         
SFX j e       asne            e         
SFX j e       asve            e         
SFX j e       arumque         e         
SFX j e       arumne          e         
SFX j e       arumve          e         
SFX j e       isque           e         
SFX j e       isne            e         
SFX j e       isve            e         

SFX i Y 24
SFX i es      es              es        
SFX i es      em              es        
SFX i es      ei              es        
SFX i es      e               es        
SFX i es      erum            es        
SFX i es      ebus            es        
SFX i 0       que             es        
SFX i 0       ne              es        
SFX i 0       ve              es        
SFX i es      emque           es        
SFX i es      emne            es        
SFX i es      emve            es        
SFX i es      eique           es        
SFX i es      eine            es        
SFX i es      eive            es        
SFX i es      eque            es        
SFX i es      ene             es        
SFX i es      eve             es        
SFX i es      erumque         es        
SFX i es      erumne          es        
SFX i es      erumve          es        
SFX i es      ebusque         es        
SFX i es      ebusne          es        
SFX i es      ebusve          es        

SFX h Y 51
SFX h us      us              us        
SFX h us      um              us        
SFX h us      ui              us        
SFX h us      u               us        
SFX h us      uum             us        
SFX h us      ibus            us        
SFX h 0       que             us        
SFX h 0       ne              us        
SFX h 0       ve              us        
SFX h us      umque           us        
SFX h us      umne            us        
SFX h us      umve            us        
SFX h us      usque           us        
SFX h us      usne            us        
SFX h us      usve            us        
SFX h us      uique           us        
SFX h us      uine            us        
SFX h us      uive            us        
SFX h us      uque            us        
SFX h us      une             us        
SFX h us      uve             us        
SFX h us      uumque          us        
SFX h us      uumne           us        
SFX h us      uumve           us        
SFX h us      ibusque         us        
SFX h us      ibusne          us        
SFX h us      ibusve          us        
SFX h u       u               u         
SFX h u       us              u         
SFX h u       ui              u         
SFX h u       ua              u         
SFX h u       uum             u         
SFX h u       ibus            u         
SFX h 0       que             u         
SFX h 0       ne              u         
SFX h 0       ve              u         
SFX h u       usque           u         
SFX h u       usne            u         
SFX h u       usve            u         
SFX h u       uique           u         
SFX h u       uine            u         
SFX h u       uive            u         
SFX h u       uaque           u         
SFX h u       uane            u         
SFX h u       uave            u         
SFX h u       uumque          u         
SFX h u       uumne           u         
SFX h u       uumve           u         
SFX h u       ibusque         u         
SFX h u       ibusne          u         
SFX h u       ibusve          u         
