Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.dic
abitus/h
accentus/h
accessus/h
accitus/h
accursus/h
acies/i
actus/h
acus/hq
adcursus/h
adfatus/h
adflatus/h
adgestus/h
aditus/h
adlapsus/h
adsensus/h
adspectus/h
adsultus/h
adventus/h
aestus/h
affatus/h
alluvies/i
ambitus/h
amictus/h
amplexus/h
anfractus/h
apotome/j
apparatus/h
aquaeductus/h
artus/abch
ascensus/h
aspectus/h
astus/h
auctus/h
auguratus/h
boatus/h
caelibatus/h
caesaries/i
caestus/h
canities/i
cantus/h
casus/h
census/h
centurionatus/h
cinctus/h
circuitus/abch
coetus/h
colus/h
cometes/j
comitatus/Sh
commeatus/h
complexus/Sh
comptus/abch
conatus/Sh
concentus/h
conceptus/h
concubitus/h
concursus/h
conflictus/h
congeries/i
congressus/Sh
coniectus/h
conluvies/i
conplexus/h
consensus/h
conspectus/h
consulatus/h
contactus/h
contemptus/h
contextus/h
contractus/abch
conventus/h
convictus/h
cornu/h
crassities/i
crepitus/h
cruciatus/h
cultus/abch
currus/h
cursus/h
decessus/h
decursus/h
dies/i
digressus/Sh
dilectus/h
discessus/h
discursus/h
domus/bh
ductus/h
durities/i
eccessus/h
effectus/h
effigies/i
egressus/Sh
eiulatus/h
epitome/j
equitatus/h
erratus/h
esus/h
eventus/h
excessus/h
excursus/h
exercitus/h
exitus/h
exortus/Sh
facies/i
factus/abch
fetus/abch
fides/iq
flatus/h
fletus/h
flexus/h
fluctus/h
fluxus/abch
fremitus/h
fructus/h
gemitus/h
genu/h
gestus/h
glacies/i
gradus/h
gressus/Sh
gustus/h
habitus/h
haustus/h
heiulatus/h
hiatus/h
hinnitus/h
hortatus/h
hypate/j
hyperbole/j
iactatus/h
iactus/h
ictus/h
Idus/h
impetus/h
impulsus/h
incessus/h
incultus/abch
incursus/h
ingluvies/i
ingressus/Sh
iniectus/h
inluvies/i
inrisus/h
instinctus/h
intellectus/h
intemperies/i
interitus/h
interventus/h
introitus/h
intuitus/Sh
isagoge/j
lacus/hq
laniatus/h
lapsus/Sh
luctus/h
lusus/h
luxus/h
macies/i
mactatus/h
magistratus/h
manus/h
materies/i
meatus/h
mensus/Sh
mercatus/h
meridies/i
mese/j
metus/h
missus/h
mollities/i
monitus/h
morsus/h
motus/h
mugitus/h
musice/j
nete/j
netus/i
nexus/h
nisus/h
nurus/h
nutricatus/h
nutus/h
obitus/h
obsonatus/h
obtentus/h
obtutus/h
occasus/h
occursus/h
ornatus/abch
ortus/Sh
ostentus/h
paramese/j
paranete/j
paratus/h
parhypate/j
partus/h
passus/Sh
pastus/h
pauperies/i
peditatus/h
penus/bh
permissus/h
pernicies/i
planctus/h
planicies/i
planities/i
plausus/h
plebes/i
ploratus/h
pontificatus/h
porticus/h
portus/h
potus/h
praegressus/h
principatus/h
prioratus/h
processus/h
progenies/i
progressus/Sh
prospectus/h
provisus/h
pugilatus/h
pulsus/h
quaestus/h
quassus/h
quercus/h
questus/Sh
Quinquatrus/h
quiritatus/h
rabies/i
receptus/h
recessus/h
reditus/h
refectus/abch
regressus/Sh
res/i
respectus/h
rictus/h
risus/h
ritus/h
saltus/h
sanies/i
secessus/h
senatus/h
sensus/h
series/iq
sexus/h
singultus/h
sinus/h
situs/abch
sonitus/h
species/i
specus/hq
spes/i
spiritus/h
status/h
strepitus/h
successus/h
succussus/h
suggestus/h
sumptus/h
superficies/i
susurrus/h
tactus/h
temperies/i
tinnitus/h
tonitrus/h
tractatus/h
tractus/h
transitus/h
tribunatus/h
tribus/hq
tumultus/h
ululatus/h
ususfructus/h
usus/Sh
vagitus/h
venatus/h
versus/h
veru/h
vestitus/h
victus/h
visus/abch
voltus/h
vomitus/h
vultus/h
